Illinois, session 104th, SB2756.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Wildlife Code is amended by changing 5Sections 2.25, 2.26, and 2.33 as follows: 6    (520 ILCS 5/2.25)  (from Ch. 61, par. 2.25)7    Sec. 2.25. It shall be unlawful for any person to take deer 8except (i) with a shotgun, centerfire handgun, centerfire 9revolver, single shot centerfire rifle, or muzzleloading rifle 10or (ii) as provided by administrative rule, with a bow and 11arrow, during the open season of not more than 14 days which 12will be set annually by the Director between the dates of 13November 1st and December 31st, both inclusive, or a special 143-day, youth-only season between the dates of September 1 and 15October 31. For the purposes of this Section, legal handguns 16and rifles are limited to centerfire revolvers, centerfire 17handguns capable of holding not more than 3 rounds in the 18magazine and chamber combined, that are either a single shot 19or revolver and centerfire rifles that are capable of holding 20not more than 3 rounds in the magazine and chamber combined 21single shot. If a centerfire handgun or centerfire rifle is 22capable of holding more than 3 rounds, it shall be fitted with 23a one-piece plug that is irremovable without dismantling the   SB2756 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 16438 BDA 29830 b1handgun or rifle or it shall be otherwise altered to render it 2incapable of holding more than 3 rounds in the magazine and 3chamber combined without dismantling the handgun or rifle. The 4only legal ammunition for a centerfire handgun or rifle is a 5bottleneck centerfire cartridge of .30 caliber or larger with 6a case length not exceeding one and two-fifths inches, or a 7straight-walled centerfire cartridge of .30 caliber or larger, 8both of which must be available as a factory load with the 9published ballistic tables of the manufacturer showing a 10capability of at least 500 foot pounds of energy at the muzzle. 11The barrel of a handgun shall be at least 4 inches. Full metal 12jacket bullets may not be used to harvest deer. Any other 13standards and specifications for use of guns, ammunition, and 14bow and arrow for deer hunting shall be established by 15administrative rule.16    No person may have in his or her possession any firearm not 17authorized by administrative rule for a specific hunting 18season when taking deer unless in accordance with the Firearm 19Concealed Carry Act.20    The Department shall make administrative rules concerning 21management restrictions applicable to the firearm and bow and 22arrow season.23    It shall be unlawful for any person to take deer except 24with a bow and arrow during the open season for bow and arrow 25set annually by the Director between the dates of September 261st and January 31st, both inclusive.  SB2756 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 16438 BDA 29830 b1    It shall be unlawful for any person to take deer except 2with (i) a muzzleloading rifle or (ii) bow and arrow during the 3open season for muzzleloading rifles set annually by the 4Director.5    The Director shall cause an administrative rule setting 6forth the prescribed rules and regulations, including bag and 7possession limits and those counties of the State where open 8seasons are established, to be published in accordance with 9Sections 1.3 and 1.13 of this Act.10    The Department may establish separate harvest periods for 11the purpose of managing or eradicating disease that has been 12found in the deer herd. This season shall be restricted to gun 13or bow and arrow hunting only. The Department shall publicly 14announce, via statewide news release, the season dates and 15shooting hours, the counties and sites open to hunting.16    The Department is authorized to establish a separate 17harvest period at specific sites within the State for the 18purpose of harvesting surplus deer that cannot be taken during 19the regular season provided for the taking of deer. This 20season shall be restricted to gun or bow and arrow hunting only 21and shall be established during the period of September 1st to 22February 15th, both inclusive. The Department shall publicly 23announce, via statewide news release, the season dates and 24shooting hours, and the counties and sites open to hunting. 25The Department shall publish suitable prescribed rules and 26regulations established by administrative rule pertaining to   SB2756 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 16438 BDA 29830 b1management restrictions applicable to this special harvest 2program. The Department shall allow unused gun deer permits 3that are left over from a regular season for the taking of deer 4to be rolled over and used during any separate harvest period 5held within 6 months of the season for which those tags were 6issued at no additional cost to the permit holder subject to 7the management restrictions applicable to the special harvest 8program. 9    If the Department is using its sharpshooting program to 10manage chronic wasting disease in a deer herd that is found in 11a county in the State and if no cases of that disease have been 12identified in that herd in the preceding 3 calendar years, 13then the Department shall end the use of that program to manage 14chronic wasting disease in that county. However, the program 15may be reinstituted within the county if chronic wasting 16disease is again identified in that herd. 17    Beginning July 1, 2019, and on an annual basis thereafter, 18the Department shall provide a report to the General Assembly 19providing information regarding deer management programs 20established by the Code or by administrative rule that 21includes: (1) the number of surplus deer taken during each 22separate harvest season; (2) the number of deer found to have a 23communicable disease or other abnormality; and (3) what 24happens to the deer taken during each separate harvest season. 25(Source: P.A. 104-58, eff. 1-1-26.)   SB2756 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 16438 BDA 29830 b1    (520 ILCS 5/2.26)  (from Ch. 61, par. 2.26)2    Sec. 2.26. Deer hunting permits. Any person attempting to 3take deer shall first obtain a "Deer Hunting Permit" issued by 4the Department in accordance with its administrative rules. 5Those rules must provide for the issuance of the following 6types of resident deer archery permits: (i) a combination 7permit, consisting of one either-sex permit and one 8antlerless-only permit, (ii) a single antlerless-only permit, 9and (iii) a single either-sex permit. The fee for a Deer 10Hunting Permit to take deer with either bow and arrow or gun 11shall not exceed $25 for residents of the State. The 12Department may by administrative rule provide for non-resident 13deer hunting permits for which the fee will not exceed $300 in 142005, $350 in 2006, and $400 in 2007 and thereafter except as 15provided below for non-resident landowners and non-resident 16archery hunters. The Department may by administrative rule 17provide for a non-resident archery deer permit consisting of 18not more than 2 harvest tags at a total cost not to exceed $325 19in 2005, $375 in 2006, and $425 in 2007 and thereafter. The 20fees for a youth resident and non-resident archery deer permit 21shall be the same. 22    The Department shall create a pilot program during the 23special 3-day, youth-only deer hunting season to allow for 24youth deer hunting permits that are valid statewide, excluding 25those counties or portions of counties closed to firearm deer 26hunting. The Department shall adopt rules to implement the   SB2756 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 16438 BDA 29830 b1pilot program. Hunters qualifying to participate in a 2youth-only deer season shall be eligible for one either-sex 3permit and one antlerless-only permit. Nothing in this 4paragraph shall be construed to prohibit the Department from 5issuing Special Hunt Area Permits for the youth-only deer 6hunting season or establishing, through administrative rule, 7additional requirements pertaining to the youth-only deer 8hunting season on Department-owned or Department-managed 9sites, including site-specific quotas or drawings. The 10provisions of this paragraph are inoperative on and after 11January 1, 2023.12    The standards and specifications for use of guns and bow 13and arrow for deer hunting shall be established by 14administrative rule.15    No person may have in his or her possession any firearm not 16authorized by administrative rule for a specific hunting 17season when taking deer unless in accordance with the Firearm 18Concealed Carry Act.19    Persons having a firearm deer hunting permit shall be 20permitted to take deer only during the period from 1/2 hour 21before sunrise to 1/2 hour after sunset, and only during those 22days for which an open season is established for the taking of 23deer by use of shotgun, handgun, rifle, or muzzle loading 24rifle.25    Persons having an archery deer hunting permit shall be 26permitted to take deer only during the period from 1/2 hour   SB2756 Enrolled- 7 -LRB104 16438 BDA 29830 b1before sunrise to 1/2 hour after sunset, and only during those 2days for which an open season is established for the taking of 3deer by use of bow and arrow.4    It shall be unlawful for any person to take deer by use of 5dogs, horses, automobiles, aircraft, or other vehicles, or by 6the use or aid of bait or baiting of any kind. For the purposes 7of this Section, "bait" means any material, whether liquid or 8solid, including food, salt, minerals, and other products, 9except pure water, that can be ingested, placed, or scattered 10in such a manner as to attract or lure white-tailed deer. 11"Baiting" means the placement or scattering of bait to attract 12deer. An area is considered as baited during the presence of 13and for 10 consecutive days following the removal of bait. 14Nothing in this Section shall prohibit the use of a dog to 15track wounded deer. Any person using a dog for tracking 16wounded deer must maintain physical control of the dog at all 17times by means of a maximum 50-foot lead attached to the dog's 18collar or harness. Tracking wounded deer is permissible at 19night, but at no time outside of legal deer hunting hours or 20seasons shall any person handling or accompanying a dog being 21used for tracking wounded deer be in possession of any firearm 22or archery device. Persons tracking wounded deer with a dog 23during the firearm deer seasons shall wear blaze orange or 24solid blaze pink color as required. Dog handlers tracking 25wounded deer with a dog are exempt from hunting license and 26deer permit requirements so long as they are accompanied by   SB2756 Enrolled- 8 -LRB104 16438 BDA 29830 b1the licensed deer hunter who wounded the deer.2    It shall be unlawful to possess or transport any wild deer 3which has been injured or killed in any manner upon a public 4highway or public right-of-way of this State unless exempted 5by administrative rule.6    Persons hunting deer must have the gun unloaded and no bow 7and arrow device shall be carried with the arrow in the nocked 8position during hours when deer hunting is unlawful.9    It shall be unlawful for any person, having taken the 10legal limit of deer by gun, to further participate with a gun 11in any deer hunting party.12    It shall be unlawful for any person, having taken the 13legal limit of deer by bow and arrow, to further participate 14with bow and arrow in any deer hunting party.15    The Department may prohibit upland game hunting during the 16gun deer season by administrative rule.17    The Department shall not limit the number of non-resident, 18either-sex archery deer hunting permits to less than 20,000. 19    Any person who violates any of the provisions of this 20Section, including administrative rules, shall be guilty of a 21Class B misdemeanor.22    For the purposes of calculating acreage under this 23Section, the Department shall, after determining the total 24acreage of the applicable tract or tracts of land, round 25remaining fractional portions of an acre greater than or equal 26to half of an acre up to the next whole acre.   SB2756 Enrolled- 9 -LRB104 16438 BDA 29830 b1    For the purposes of taking white-tailed deer, nothing in 2this Section shall be construed to prevent the manipulation, 3including mowing or cutting, of standing crops as a normal 4agricultural or soil stabilization practice, food plots, or 5normal agricultural practices, including planting, harvesting, 6and maintenance such as cultivating or the use of products 7designed for scent only and not capable of ingestion, solid or 8liquid, placed or scattered, in such a manner as to attract or 9lure deer. Such manipulation for the purpose of taking 10white-tailed deer may be further modified by administrative 11rule. 12(Source: P.A. 104-361, eff. 1-1-26; 104-417, eff. 8-15-25.) 13    (520 ILCS 5/2.33)14    Sec. 2.33. Prohibitions. 15    (a) It is unlawful to carry or possess any gun in any State 16refuge unless otherwise permitted by administrative rule.17    (b) It is unlawful to use or possess any snare or 18snare-like device, deadfall, net, or pit trap to take any 19species, except that snares not powered by springs or other 20mechanical devices may be used to trap fur-bearing mammals, in 21water sets only, if at least one-half of the snare noose is 22located underwater at all times.23    (c) It is unlawful for any person at any time to take a 24wild mammal protected by this Act from its den by means of any 25mechanical device, spade, or digging device or to use smoke or   SB2756 Enrolled- 10 -LRB104 16438 BDA 29830 b1other gases to dislodge or remove such mammal except as 2provided in Section 2.37.3    (d) It is unlawful to use a ferret or any other small 4mammal which is used in the same or similar manner for which 5ferrets are used for the purpose of frightening or driving any 6mammals from their dens or hiding places.7    (e) (Blank).8    (f) It is unlawful to use spears, gigs, hooks, or any like 9device to take any species protected by this Act.10    (g) It is unlawful to use poisons, chemicals, or 11explosives for the purpose of taking any species protected by 12this Act.13    (h) It is unlawful to hunt adjacent to or near any peat, 14grass, brush, or other inflammable substance when it is 15burning.16    (i) It is unlawful to take, pursue or intentionally harass 17or disturb in any manner any wild birds or mammals by use or 18aid of any vehicle, conveyance, or unmanned aircraft as 19defined by the Illinois Aeronautics Act, except as permitted 20by the Code of Federal Regulations for the taking of 21waterfowl; except that nothing in this subsection shall 22prohibit the use of unmanned aircraft in the inspection of a 23public utility facility, tower, or structure or a mobile 24service facility, tower, or structure by a public utility, as 25defined in Section 3-105 of the Public Utilities Act, or a 26provider of mobile services as defined in Section 153 of Title   SB2756 Enrolled- 11 -LRB104 16438 BDA 29830 b147 of the United States Code. It is also unlawful to use the 2lights of any vehicle or conveyance, any light connected to 3any vehicle or conveyance, or any other lighting device or 4mechanism from inside or on a vehicle or conveyance in any area 5where wildlife may be found except in accordance with Section 62.37 of this Act; however, nothing in this Section shall 7prohibit the normal use of headlamps for the purpose of 8driving upon a roadway. For purposes of this Section, any 9other lighting device or mechanism shall include, but not be 10limited to, any device that uses infrared or other light not 11visible to the naked eye, electronic image intensification, 12active illumination, thermal imaging, or night vision. Striped 13skunk, opossum, red fox, gray fox, raccoon, bobcat, and coyote 14may be taken during the open season by use of a small light 15which is worn on the body or hand-held by a person on foot and 16not in any vehicle.17    (j) It is unlawful to use any shotgun larger than 10 gauge 18while taking or attempting to take any of the species 19protected by this Act.20    (k) It is unlawful to use or possess in the field any 21shotgun shell loaded with a shot size larger than lead BB or 22steel T (.20 diameter) when taking or attempting to take any 23species of wild game mammals (excluding white-tailed deer), 24wild game birds, migratory waterfowl or migratory game birds 25protected by this Act, except white-tailed deer as provided 26for in Section 2.26 and other species as provided for by   SB2756 Enrolled- 12 -LRB104 16438 BDA 29830 b1subsection (l) or administrative rule.2    (l) It is unlawful to take any species of wild game, except 3white-tailed deer and fur-bearing mammals, with a shotgun 4loaded with slugs unless otherwise provided for by 5administrative rule.6    (m) It is unlawful to use any shotgun capable of holding 7more than 3 shells in the magazine or chamber combined, except 8on game breeding and hunting preserve areas licensed under 9Section 3.27 and except as permitted by the Code of Federal 10Regulations for the taking of waterfowl. If the shotgun is 11capable of holding more than 3 shells, it shall, while being 12used on an area other than a game breeding and shooting 13preserve area licensed pursuant to Section 3.27, be fitted 14with a one-piece plug that is irremovable without dismantling 15the shotgun or otherwise altered to render it incapable of 16holding more than 3 shells in the magazine and chamber, 17combined.18    (n) It is unlawful for any person, except persons who 19possess a permit to hunt from a vehicle as provided in this 20Section and persons otherwise permitted by law, to have or 21carry any gun in or on any vehicle, conveyance, or aircraft, 22unless such gun is unloaded and enclosed in a case, except that 23at field trials authorized by Section 2.34 of this Act, 24unloaded guns or guns loaded with blank cartridges only may be 25carried on horseback while not contained in a case, or to have 26or carry any bow or arrow device in or on any vehicle unless   SB2756 Enrolled- 13 -LRB104 16438 BDA 29830 b1such bow or arrow device is unstrung or enclosed in a case, or 2otherwise made inoperable unless in accordance with the 3Firearm Concealed Carry Act.4    (o) (Blank).5    (p) It is unlawful to take game birds, migratory game 6birds or migratory waterfowl with a rifle, pistol, revolver, 7or air rifle.8    (q) It is unlawful to fire a rifle, pistol, revolver, or 9air rifle on, over, or into any waters of this State, including 10frozen waters.11    (r) It is unlawful to discharge any gun or bow and arrow 12device along, upon, across, or from any public right-of-way or 13highway in this State.14    (s) It is unlawful to use a silencer or other device to 15muffle or mute the sound of the explosion or report resulting 16from the firing of any gun.17    (t) It is unlawful for any person to take or attempt to 18take any species of wildlife or parts thereof, or allow a dog 19to hunt, within or upon the land of another, or upon waters 20flowing over or standing on the land of another, or to 21knowingly shoot a gun or bow and arrow device at any wildlife 22physically on or flying over the property of another without 23first obtaining permission from the owner or the owner's 24designee. For the purposes of this Section, the owner's 25designee means anyone who the owner designates in a written 26authorization and the authorization must contain (i) the legal   SB2756 Enrolled- 14 -LRB104 16438 BDA 29830 b1or common description of property for which such authority is 2given, (ii) the extent that the owner's designee is authorized 3to make decisions regarding who is allowed to take or attempt 4to take any species of wildlife or parts thereof, and (iii) the 5owner's notarized signature. Before enforcing this Section, 6the law enforcement officer must have received notice from the 7owner or the owner's designee of a violation of this Section. 8Statements made to the law enforcement officer regarding this 9notice shall not be rendered inadmissible by the hearsay rule 10when offered for the purpose of showing the required notice.11    (u) It is unlawful for any person to discharge any firearm 12for the purpose of taking any of the species protected by this 13Act, or hunt with gun or dog, or allow a dog to hunt, within 14300 yards of an inhabited dwelling without first obtaining 15permission from the owner or tenant, except that while 16trapping, hunting with bow and arrow, hunting with dog and 17shotgun using shot shells only, or hunting with shotgun using 18shot shells only, or providing outfitting services under a 19waterfowl outfitter permit, or on licensed game breeding and 20hunting preserve areas, as defined in Section 3.27, on 21federally owned and managed lands and on Department owned, 22managed, leased, or controlled lands, a 100 yard restriction 23shall apply.24    (v) It is unlawful for any person to remove fur-bearing 25mammals from, or to move or disturb in any manner, the traps 26owned by another person without written authorization of the   SB2756 Enrolled- 15 -LRB104 16438 BDA 29830 b1owner to do so.2    (w) It is unlawful for any owner of a dog to allow his or 3her dog to pursue, harass, or kill deer, except that nothing in 4this Section shall prohibit the tracking of wounded deer with 5a dog in accordance with the provisions of Section 2.26 of this 6Code.7    (x) It is unlawful for any person to wantonly or 8carelessly injure or destroy, in any manner whatsoever, any 9real or personal property on the land of another while engaged 10in hunting or trapping thereon.11    (y) It is unlawful to hunt wild game protected by this Act 12between one-half hour after sunset and one-half hour before 13sunrise, except that hunting hours between one-half hour after 14sunset and one-half hour before sunrise may be established by 15administrative rule for fur-bearing mammals.16    (z) It is unlawful to take any game bird (excluding wild 17turkeys and crippled pheasants not capable of normal flight 18and otherwise irretrievable) protected by this Act when not 19flying. Nothing in this Section shall prohibit a person from 20carrying an uncased, unloaded shotgun in a boat, while in 21pursuit of a crippled migratory waterfowl that is incapable of 22normal flight, for the purpose of attempting to reduce the 23migratory waterfowl to possession, provided that the attempt 24is made immediately upon downing the migratory waterfowl and 25is done within 400 yards of the blind from which the migratory 26waterfowl was downed. This exception shall apply only to   SB2756 Enrolled- 16 -LRB104 16438 BDA 29830 b1migratory game birds that are not capable of normal flight. 2Migratory waterfowl that are crippled may be taken only with a 3shotgun as regulated by subsection (j) of this Section using 4shotgun shells as regulated in subsection (k) of this Section.5    (aa) It is unlawful to use or possess any device that may 6be used for tree climbing or cutting while hunting fur-bearing 7mammals, excluding coyotes. However, coyotes may not be hunted 8utilizing these devices during open season for deer except by 9properly licensed deer hunters.10    (bb) It is unlawful for any person, except licensed game 11breeders, pursuant to Section 2.29 to import, carry into, or 12possess alive in this State any species of wildlife taken 13outside of this State, without obtaining permission to do so 14from the Director.15    (cc) It is unlawful for any person to have in his or her 16possession any freshly killed species protected by this Act 17during the season closed for taking.18    (dd) It is unlawful to take any species protected by this 19Act and retain it alive except as provided by administrative 20rule.21    (ee) It is unlawful to possess any rifle while in the field 22during gun deer season except as provided in Sections 2.25 and 232.26 and administrative rules.24    (ff) It is unlawful for any person to take any species 25protected by this Act, except migratory waterfowl, during the 26gun deer hunting season in those counties open to gun deer   SB2756 Enrolled- 17 -LRB104 16438 BDA 29830 b1hunting, unless he or she wears, when in the field, a cap and 2upper outer garment of a solid blaze orange color or solid 3blaze pink color, with such articles of clothing displaying a 4minimum of 400 square inches of blaze orange or solid blaze 5pink color material.6    (gg) It is unlawful during the upland game season for any 7person to take upland game with a firearm unless he or she 8wears, while in the field, a cap of solid blaze orange color or 9solid blaze pink color. For purposes of this Act, upland game 10is defined as Bobwhite Quail, Hungarian Partridge, Ring-necked 11Pheasant, Eastern Cottontail, and Swamp Rabbit.12    (hh) It shall be unlawful to kill or cripple any species 13protected by this Act for which there is a bag limit without 14making a reasonable effort to retrieve such species and 15include such in the bag limit. It shall be unlawful for any 16person having control over harvested game mammals, game birds, 17or migratory game birds for which there is a bag limit to 18wantonly waste or destroy the usable meat of the game, except 19this shall not apply to wildlife taken under Sections 2.37 or 203.22 of this Code. For purposes of this subsection, "usable 21meat" means the breast meat of a game bird or migratory game 22bird and the hind ham and front shoulders of a game mammal. It 23shall be unlawful for any person to place, leave, dump, or 24abandon a wildlife carcass or parts of it along or upon a 25public right-of-way or highway or on public or private 26property, including a waterway or stream, without the   SB2756 Enrolled- 18 -LRB104 16438 BDA 29830 b1permission of the owner or tenant. It shall not be unlawful to 2discard game meat that is determined to be unfit for human 3consumption.4    (ii) This Section shall apply only to those species 5protected by this Act taken within the State. Any species or 6any parts thereof, legally taken in and transported from other 7states or countries, may be possessed within the State, except 8as provided in this Section and Sections 2.35, 2.36, and 3.21.9    (jj) (Blank).10    (kk) Nothing contained in this Section shall prohibit the 11Director from issuing permits to paraplegics or to other 12persons with disabilities who meet the requirements set forth 13in administrative rule to shoot or hunt from a vehicle as 14provided by that rule, provided that such is otherwise in 15accord with this Act.16    (ll) Nothing contained in this Act shall prohibit the 17taking of aquatic life protected by the Fish and Aquatic Life 18Code or birds and mammals protected by this Act, except deer 19and fur-bearing mammals, from a boat not camouflaged or 20disguised to alter its identity or to further provide a place 21of concealment and not propelled by sail or mechanical power. 22However, only shotguns not larger than 10 gauge nor smaller 23than .410 bore loaded with not more than 3 shells of a shot 24size no larger than lead BB or steel T (.20 diameter) may be 25used to take species protected by this Act.26    (mm) Nothing contained in this Act shall prohibit the use   SB2756 Enrolled- 19 -LRB104 16438 BDA 29830 b1of a shotgun, not larger than 10 gauge nor smaller than a 20 2gauge, with a rifled barrel.3    (nn) It shall be unlawful to possess any species of 4wildlife or wildlife parts taken unlawfully in Illinois, any 5other state, or any other country, whether or not the wildlife 6or wildlife parts are indigenous to Illinois. For the purposes 7of this subsection, the statute of limitations for unlawful 8possession of wildlife or wildlife parts shall not cease until 92 years after the possession has permanently ended. 10    (oo) It is unlawful while deer hunting: (1) to possess, or 11be in close proximity to a rifle that is not centerfire; or (2) 12be in close proximity to, or to be in possession of or in close 13proximity to a magazine that is capable of making a rifle not a 14single shot. use a rifle, handgun, revolver, or muzzleloading 15rifle or a magazine that is not in compliance with Section 2.25 16or administrative rules adopted pursuant to this Act. 17(Source: P.A. 102-237, eff. 1-1-22; 102-837, eff. 5-13-22; 18102-932, eff. 1-1-23; 103-154, eff. 6-30-23.) 19    (520 ILCS 5/1.2bb rep.)20    Section 10. The Wildlife Code is amended by repealing 21Section 1.2bb.